District of Columbia statutes.
13-425

Inconvenient forum.

When any District of Columbia court finds that in the interest of substantial justice the action should be heard in another forum, the court may stay or dismiss such civil action in whole or in part on any conditions that may be just.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)

History

1981 Ed., § 13-425.
1973 Ed., § 13-425.

Prior Codifications